Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 5. GOVERNMENTAL LIABILITY

CHAPTER 116. SETTLEMENT OF CLAIM OR ACTION AGAINST GOVERNMENTAL UNIT

Sec. 116.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "governmental unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 101.001.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 688 (H.B. 53), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 116.002. CERTAIN SETTLEMENT TERMS PROHIBITED. (a) A governmental unit may not enter into a settlement of a claim or action against the governmental unit in which:

(1) the amount of the settlement is equal to or greater than $30,000;

(2) the money that would be used to pay the settlement is:

(A) derived from taxes collected by a governmental unit;

(B) received from the state; or

(C) insurance proceeds received from an insurance policy for which the premium was paid with taxes collected by a governmental unit or money received from the state; and

(3) a condition of the settlement requires a party seeking affirmative relief against the governmental unit to agree not to disclose any fact, allegation, evidence, or other matter to any other person, including a journalist or other member of the media.

(b) A settlement agreement provision entered into in violation of Subsection (a) is void and unenforceable.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 688 (H.B. 53), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 116.003. EFFECT OF CHAPTER. This chapter does not affect information that is privileged or confidential under other law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 688 (H.B. 53), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.